Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2601
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-2601 to 8-2615 shall be known and may be cited as the Credit Report Protection Act.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 1.

Consumer reporting agency, duty to furnish information to consumer, see section 20-149.